Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3311
Licensed veterinary technician, defined.

Licensed veterinary technician means an individual who is validly and currently licensed as a veterinary technician in this state.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1093.